Hawaii statutes.
PART XII.
EXPENSES

A. Election
Expenses

§11-181 Capital equipment. The State
shall pay for all voting system capital equipment. This shall include, but not
be limited to voting machines, voting devices, and initial computer programs.
[L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1975, c 36, §1(16)]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next